District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.143

Repealed

Duties of Recorder of Deeds transferred to Mayor.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 238, ch. 269, § 143
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 575, Pub. L. 85-254, § 35
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-953.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.44.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.143.